Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 32
SOUTHERN IDAHO COLLEGE OF EDUCATION

Section.

33-3201. Declaration of policy. [Repealed.]

33-3202. Title to property.

All the rights, powers, duties, and title to real estate or personal property belonging to or vested in said Southern Idaho College of Education are hereby vested in the state board of land commissioners and their successors in office with full power vested in the state board of land commissioners to lease or sell such property in their name and in the name of the state of Idaho.

33-3203 — 33-3206. Power to lease or sell property — Terms and conditions of the lease or sale — Excluded property. [Repealed.]

33-3207. Conflict.

All statues [statutes] and laws of the state of Idaho that may conflict with this act shall be inapplicable.